Montana, session 2025, HB750.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Annual increase for reimbursement of covered services. Except as
provided in 53-6-125, the department shall annually increase the reimbursement rate to providers of covered
services by a minimum of 2%.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 53, chapter 6, part 1, and the provisions of Title 53, chapter 6, part 1, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 750